Utah statutes.
31A-9-213.   Amendment of articles of incorporation.
(1)  The articles of a fraternal may provide for amendment by the supreme
governing body or by the board of directors, and may also provide for
amendment by an affirmative vote of a majority of those members who vote in a
referendum.  Only votes cast within 60 days from the date of mailing the first
ballot by the fraternal are counted.  The timeliness of a vote is determined
by the date of its mailing as evidenced by its postmark or other suitable
evidence.
(2)  For five years after the initial issuance of a certificate of authority,
proposed amendments of the articles shall be filed with the commissioner at
least 30 days before the amendment is submitted for approval to the members or
to the supreme governing body.  If the approval of the members or the supreme
governing body is not required, proposed amendments to the articles shall be
filed with the commissioner at least 30 days before their effective date.
(3)  No amendment is effective until the articles of amendment are filed with
the commissioner, together with a statement of the results of the voting on
the amendment or a statement that no vote is required.
(4)  Within four months after filing the articles of amendment with the
commissioner, they shall be furnished to all members either by mail or under
Subsection 31A-9-402(1).
